Georgia, session 2025_26, HB891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 10 of Chapter 2 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Georgia State Employees' Pension and Savings Plan, is amended by revising Code Section
47-2-352, relating to employee and employer contributions, as follows:
"47-2-352.
(a) Every member subject to this article shall contribute employee membership
contributions in an amount equal to 1 1/4 percent of earnable compensation for service
prior to July 1, 2026, and 3 percent of earnable compensation for service on or after July
1, 2026; provided, however, that the board of trustees is authorized to set the contribution
rate at a level not less than 3 percent of earnable compensation nor more than 4 percent of
H. B. 891
- 1 -

LC 56 0413
earnable compensation for service on or after July 1, 2026, which shall be deducted by each
employer from the earnable compensation of each member for each and every payroll
period and paid monthly to the board of trustees. Such amount shall be credited to the
individual accounts of the members in the annuity savings fund.
(b) From and after January 1, 2009, each employer shall pay monthly to the board of
trustees, on behalf of each member subject to this article, the aggregate of employer and
employee contributions required by this chapter. With respect to members subject to this
article, no employer contributions shall be considered as accumulated contributions of the
member and none shall be eligible for withdrawal by the member upon cessation of state
service. Such amount shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 47-2-353, relating to service
retirement allowance, as follows:
"47-2-353.
Every member subject to this article shall, upon becoming eligible under the provisions of
this chapter, be entitled to a service retirement allowance, which shall consist of:
(1) An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of the member's accumulated
contributions at the time of retirement; and
(2) A monthly pension which, together with the annuity, shall provide a total retirement
allowance equal to the sum of 1 percent, or such future amount up to 2 percent to be set
by the board of trustees in direct relation to any increased appropriations provided by the
General Assembly expressly for such increase, of the member's highest average monthly
earnable compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while a
member of the retirement system, multiplied by the number for each of the member's
years of creditable service earned before July 1, 2026, of the member's highest average
monthly earnable compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while
H. B. 891
- 2 -

LC 56 0413
a member of the retirement system, and 1 1/2 percent for each of the member's years of
creditable service earned on or after July 1, 2026, of the member's highest average
monthly earnable compensation during a period of 24 consecutive calendar months while
a member of the retirement system; provided, however, that for members employed on
or after July 1, 2009, no salary increase by adjustment in compensation in any manner
during the last 12 months, which increase is in excess of 5 percent, shall be included in
such computation."
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026, only if it is determined to have been
concurrently funded as provided in Chapter 20 of Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia
Annotated, the "Public Retirement Systems Standards Law"; otherwise, this Act shall not
become effective and shall be automatically repealed in its entirety on July 1, 2026, as
required by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-20-50.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 891
- 3 -